FST/hsi/hsi.foma
read lexc morph_hsi.lexc
define morph

source phonetize_hsi.xfst
define phon

define shorten ā -> a || _ "^" PL3,,ā -> 0 || _ "^" PL1;
define exceptions PL3 -> y u s || m i r i "^" _,, o -> 0 || t ā f f _ "^" PL1,, PL1 -> e n || t ā f f "^" _,, %+PL -> k ā || v i y ā v "^" _,, ā -> e|| g _ r b o "^" PL2,, PL1 -> l e n || t ʰ a l "^" _;
define plural PL1 -> y e n || vowel "^" _,,PL1 -> e n || consonant consonant "^" _,,PL2 -> ā s|| consonant "^" _,,PL2 -> ā || vowel "^" _,,PL3 -> y u || vowel "^" _,, PL3 -> u || consonant "^" _;
define clean "^" -> 0;
define tidy vowel -> 0 || _ ā;


! regex morph .o. phon .o. shorten .o. exceptions;
! regex morph .o. phon .o. shorten .o. exceptions .o. clean .o. tidy;

regex morph .o. phon .o. shorten .o. exceptions .o. plural .o. clean .o. tidy;

save stack hsi.bin


down peter+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down šorko+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down šurki+N+NOM+FEM+PL
down šurki+N+non{NOM}+PL+FEM
down kozoro+N+NOM+MASC+SG
down kozoro+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down zayfā+N+NOM+FEM+SG
down zayfā+N+NOM+FEM+PL
down zayfā+N+non{NOM}+PL+FEM
down mers+N+NOM+MASC+SG
down mers+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down miri+N+NOM+FEM+SG
down miri+N+NOM+FEM+PL
down kotoro+N+NOM+MASC+SG
down kotoro+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down gārbo+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down gārbo+N+NOM+MASC+SG
down fil+N+NOM+FEM+SG
down fil+N+NOM+FEM+PL
down gazzi+N+NOM+FEM+SG
down gazzi+N+NOM+FEM+PL
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+PL
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG+PSS1S
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG+PSS2S
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG+PSS3S
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG+PSS1P
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG+PSS2P
down gohro+N+NOM+MASC+SG+PSS3P
down āno+N+NOM+SG
down āno+N+non{NOM}+PL
down čuki+N+NOM+FEM+SG
down čuki+N+NOM+FEM+PL
down čuki+N+non{NOM}+PL+FEM
down tʰal+N+NOM+SG
down tʰal+N+non{NOM}+PL
down olu+N+NOM+SG
down olu+N+non{NOM}+PL
down viyāv+N+NOM+SG
down viyāv+N+NOM+PL
down ambo+N+NOM+SG
down ambo+N+non{NOM}+PL
down tāffo+N+NOM+SG
down tāffo+N+non{NOM}+PL
